Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1404
Sheep; auction markets; requirements.

All sheep released from auction markets must be accompanied by form P-10 Nebraska permit to move livestock provided by the Department of Agriculture on which shall be designated the number of animals, purpose and destination of the shipment. An original and one copy of this form must be mailed to the Bureau of Animal Industry.

Any auction market that handles sheep to be sold for purposes other than direct to slaughter must maintain approved dipping facilities.

If yarding facilities are maintained which are sufficient to prevent commingling with other sheep and these facilities are not used for any other purpose, sheep from counties within an area designated as scabies free may be released without dipping. Sheep dipped within ten days prior to arrival at auction markets and where such dipping is supported by approved certification, may be released without further dipping. Sheep not in the above two categories must be dipped in a permitted dip maintained at a required strength under the supervision of a state or federal inspector in accordance with the directions issued by the Department of Agriculture, Bureau of Animal Industry within ten days of release.

Laws 1965, c. 327, § 4, p. 938.